Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 17 Georgia Grown Farm to Food Bank Program (F2FB)

2-17-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Grown Farm to Food Bank Program (F2FB).”

History.

Code 1981, §

2-17-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1129, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 91, § 1/SB 396.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “Georgia Grown Farm to Food Bank Program (F2FB)” for “Georgia State Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP)”.

2-17-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Department” means the Georgia Department of Agriculture.

“Emergency food provider” means a nonprofit, charitable organization that offers groceries or meals to people who are in need of food assistance and who reside in this state.

“Program” means the Georgia Grown Farm to Food Bank Program (F2FB) created by this chapter.

“Program participant” means an individual or household which is in need of short-term food assistance to supplement the diet in order to prevent hunger or malnutrition, or both.

“Regional food bank” means an established nonprofit charitable organization which is qualified as exempt from taxation under the provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and which, as part of an existing food bank network, maintains a food distribution operation providing food to nonprofit food pantries and feeding centers that offer groceries or meals to people in need of food assistance.

“State nutrition information organization” means an established nonprofit charitable organization which is qualified as exempt from taxation under the provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and which, as part of its mission, fosters and promotes general health through nutrition education of the public.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-17-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1129, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 91, § 1/SB 396.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “Georgia Grown Farm to Food Bank Program (F2FB)” for “Georgia State Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP)” in paragraph (3).

U.S. Code.

Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code referred to in this Code section, is codified as

26 U.S.C. § 501(c)

(3).

2-17-3.
Grants to regional food banks; administration; powers and duties of Department of Agriculture.

The Georgia Grown Farm to Food Bank Program (F2FB) is established to provide grants to regional food banks within this state for the purchase, transportation, storage, and distribution of food to emergency food providers and program participants. Such grants shall be made from funds available to the department for such purpose. Grants made pursuant to the program shall be used only for the purchase of food or agricultural commodities from Georgia grown products, as that term is used in Code Section 2-8-90, purveyors, producers, or processors for repacking or processing, or both, of food for distribution to emergency food providers and program participants.

The program shall be administered by the department.

All food purchases made through the use of program funds shall be made in accordance with the following standards:

All food shall be procured from Georgia grown sources;

Food shall be purchased at a level equal to or greater than the seller’s input costs plus one-half of the projected appreciation costs; and

Food purchased with funds through the program shall not duplicate food available through the federal commodities program of the United States Department of Agriculture.

The department shall contract with regional food banks for the operation of the program. The department, in conjunction with regional food banks, is authorized to take appropriate actions, including the entry of subcontracts, to ensure uniform access to the program by needy residents of this state. The department may allow a state nutrition information organization to provide free nutrition education as part of the program to residents of this state.

The department shall, by rule or regulation, establish and enforce procedures and guidelines for the determination of eligibility for participation in the program. Such rules, regulations, and procedures shall not limit or affect the established guidelines used by emergency food providers for any of their programs for which no funds are provided through the program established pursuant to this chapter. No person who is eligible for food funded by the program shall be charged for food or encouraged to contribute money in order to receive food under the program.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-17-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1129, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 91, § 1/SB 396.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in subsection (a), substituted “Georgia Grown Farm to Food Bank Program (F2FB)” for “Georgia State Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP)”, and “grown products, as that term is used in Code Section 2-8-90, purveyors, producers, or processors” for “based purveyors or producers”; deleted “and all administrative costs shall be reimbursed to the department from the funds described in subsection (a) of this Code section” following “department” from the end of subsection (b); substituted “grown” for “based” in paragraph (c)(1), substituted “a level equal to or greater than the seller's input costs plus one-half of the projected appreciation costs” for “wholesale, competitive bid prices or better” in paragraph (c)(2); deleted former subsection (d), which read: “Not more than 7 percent of the grant funds made available through the program shall be used by any regional food bank for the payment of administrative and incidental costs.”; and redesignated former subsections (e) and (f) as subsections (d) and (e), respectively.

2-17-4.
Annual review and audit.

The program established pursuant to this chapter and any funds granted pursuant to this chapter or expenditures made with such funds are subject to review and audit by the department and the state auditor to determine proper operation of the program and compliance with statutes, regulations, and policies. Contractors, subcontractors, and others receiving funds or commodities under this chapter shall be subject to audit and review by the state auditor at reasonable times.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-17-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1129, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 91, § 1/SB 396.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 91, § 2/SB 396, effective July 1, 2022, reenacted this Code section without change.

2-17-5.
Annual report.

Within 90 days of the conclusion of the state’s fiscal year, any entity with which the department has contracted for the operation of the program shall submit to the department an annual report which shall account fully for and shall specify the expenditure of funds made pursuant to the program, the dollar value of Georgia grown products distributed, the number of people and households served in each county, the type and weight of food purchased, and the names of each Georgia grown product purveyor, producer, or processor from whom the program participant procured food. Within 180 days of the end of the state’s fiscal year, the Commissioner shall submit an annual report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. Such report shall include, but not be limited to, relevant information concerning the operation of the program for the preceding fiscal year, the quantity and dollar value of Georgia products distributed, the number of people and households served in each county, and the type and weight of food purchased.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-17-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1129, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 91, § 1/SB 396.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence, substituted “value of Georgia grown” for “value of Georgia”, deleted “and” preceding “the type”, and added “, and the names of each Georgia grown product purveyor, producer, or processor from whom the program participant procured food” at the end.

2-17-6.
Violations; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person providing services to the department or to any regional food bank or emergency food provider which receives funds or food through the program or for any official or employee of the department to receive food for personal use, unless qualified as a recipient through the program, or to provide services for profit pursuant to the program created by this chapter. Any person violating this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-17-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1129, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 91, § 1/SB 396.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence, deleted “voluntary” following “providing”, inserted “, unless qualified as a recipient” and inserted a comma following “program”.